Ohio, session 136, HB838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4117.10, 5747.50, 5747.502, 5747.504, 5747.505, 5747.51, and 5747.53 be amended and sections 9.051, 5164.21, and 5747.506 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 9.051. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Local authority" has the same meaning as in section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. (2) "Policy, contract, or plan" means a policy, contract, or plan of one or more insurance companies, medical care corporations, health care corporations, health maintenance organizations, or other entities that provide health, medical, hospital, or surgical coverage, benefits, or services. "Policy, contract, or plan" includes a plan that is associated with a self-insurance program and a policy, contract, or plan that implements a collective bargaining agreement. (3) "Gender reassignment surgery" has the same meaning as in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code. (B) On and after the effective date of this section, neither the state or a local authority shall provide a policy, contract, or plan to its elected or appointed officers or employees that includes coverage, benefits, or services for gender reassignment surgery. (C) Annually, on or before the last day of April, each local authority shall certify to the attorney general whether it is in compliance with division (B) of this section. (D) Annually, on or before the fifteenth day of June, the attorney general shall certify to the tax commissioner a list of each local authority that has certified its noncompliance, or failed to certify compliance, with division (B) of this section. Sec. 4117.10. (A) An agreement between a public employer and an exclusive representative entered into pursuant to this chapter governs the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of public employment covered by the agreement. If the agreement provides for a final and binding arbitration of grievances, public employers, employees, and employee organizations are subject solely to that grievance procedure and the state personnel board of review or civil service commissions have no jurisdiction to receive and determine any appeals relating to matters that were the subject of a final and binding grievance procedure. Where no agreement exists or where an agreement makes no specification about a matter, the public employer and public employees are subject to all applicable state or local laws or ordinances pertaining to the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment for public employees. All of the following prevail over conflicting provisions of agreements between employee organizations and public employers: (1) Laws pertaining to any of the following subjects: (a) Civil rights; (b) Affirmative action; (c) Unemployment compensation; (d) Workers' compensation; (e) The retirement of public employees; (f) Residency requirements; (g) The minimum educational requirements contained in the Revised Code pertaining to public education including the requirement of a certificate by the fiscal officer of a school district pursuant to section 5705.41 of the Revised Code; (h) The provisions of division (A) of section 124.34 of the Revised Code governing the disciplining of officers and employees who have been convicted of a felony; (i) The minimum standards promulgated by the director of education and workforce pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (2) The law pertaining to the leave of absence and compensation provided under section 5923.05 of the Revised Code, if the terms of the agreement contain benefits which are less than those contained in that section or the agreement contains no such terms and the public authority is the state or any agency, authority, commission, or board of the state or if the public authority is another entity listed in division (B) of section 4117.01 of the Revised Code that elects to provide leave of absence and compensation as provided in section 5923.05 of the Revised Code; (3) The law pertaining to the leave established under section 5906.02 of the Revised Code, if the terms of the agreement contain benefits that are less than those contained in section 5906.02 of the Revised Code; (4) The law pertaining to excess benefits prohibited under section 3345.311 of the Revised Code with respect to an agreement between an employee organization and a public employer entered into on or after September 29, 2015; (5) state State employee work location policies with respect to an agreement between an employee organization and a public employer entered into on or after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025; (6) The law prohibiting coverage for gender reassignment surgery in health benefit plans for state and local authority employees under section 9.051 of the Revised Code with respect to an agreement between an employee organization and a public employer entered into on or after the effective date of this amendment. Except for sections 306.08, 306.12, 306.35, and 4981.22 of the Revised Code and arrangements entered into thereunder, and section 4981.21 of the Revised Code as necessary to comply with section 13(c) of the "Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964," 87 Stat. 295, 49 U.S.C.A. 1609(c), as amended, and arrangements entered into thereunder, this chapter prevails over any and all other conflicting laws, resolutions, provisions, present or future, except as otherwise specified in this chapter or as otherwise specified by the general assembly. Nothing in this section prohibits or shall be construed to invalidate the provisions of an agreement establishing supplemental workers' compensation or unemployment compensation benefits or exceeding minimum requirements contained in the Revised Code pertaining to public education or the minimum standards promulgated by the director of education and workforce pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (B) The public employer shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement an agreement and for approval of any other matter requiring the approval of the appropriate legislative body to the legislative body within fourteen days of the date on which the parties finalize the agreement, unless otherwise specified, but if the appropriate legislative body is not in session at the time, then within fourteen days after it convenes. The legislative body must approve or reject the submission as a whole, and the submission is deemed approved if the legislative body fails to act within thirty days after the public employer submits the agreement. The parties may specify that those provisions of the agreement not requiring action by a legislative body are effective and operative in accordance with the terms of the agreement, provided there has been compliance with division (C) of this section. If the legislative body rejects the submission of the public employer, either party may reopen all or part of the entire agreement. As used in this section, "legislative body" includes the governing board of a municipal corporation, school district, college or university, village, township, or board of county commissioners or any other body that has authority to approve the budget of their public jurisdiction and, with regard to the state, "legislative body" means the controlling board. (C) The chief executive officer, or the chief executive officer's representative, of each municipal corporation, the designated representative of the board of education of each school district, college or university, or any other body that has authority to approve the budget of their public jurisdiction, the designated representative of the board of county commissioners and of each elected officeholder of the county whose employees are covered by the collective negotiations, and the designated representative of the village or the board of township trustees of each township is responsible for negotiations in the collective bargaining process; except that the legislative body may accept or reject a proposed collective bargaining agreement. When the matters about which there is agreement are reduced to writing and approved by the employee organization and the legislative body, the agreement is binding upon the legislative body, the employer, and the employee organization and employees covered by the agreement. (D) There is hereby established an office of collective bargaining in the department of administrative services for the purpose of negotiating with and entering into written agreements between state agencies, departments, boards, and commissions and the exclusive representative on matters of wages, hours, terms and other conditions of employment and the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement. Nothing in any provision of law to the contrary shall be interpreted as excluding the bureau of workers' compensation and the industrial commission from the preceding sentence. This office shall not negotiate on behalf of other statewide elected officials or boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education who shall be considered as separate public employers for the purposes of this chapter; however, the office may negotiate on behalf of these officials or trustees where authorized by the officials or trustees. The staff of the office of collective bargaining are in the unclassified service. The director of administrative services shall fix the compensation of the staff. The office of collective bargaining shall: (1) Assist the director in formulating management's philosophy for public collective bargaining as well as planning bargaining strategies; (2) Conduct negotiations with the exclusive representatives of each employee organization; (3) Coordinate the state's resources in all mediation, fact-finding, and arbitration cases as well as in all labor disputes; (4) Conduct systematic reviews of collective bargaining agreements for the purpose of contract negotiations; (5) Coordinate the systematic compilation of data by all agencies that is required for negotiating purposes; (6) Prepare and submit an annual report and other reports as requested to the governor and the general assembly on the implementation of this chapter and its impact upon state government. Sec. 5164.21. (A) As used in this section, "gender reassignment surgery" has the same meaning as in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The medicaid program shall not cover gender reassignment surgery. Sec. 5747.50. (A) As used in this section: (1) "County's proportionate share of the calendar year 2007 LGF and LGRAF distributions" means the percentage computed for the county under division (B)(1)(a) of section 5747.501 of the Revised Code. (2) "County's proportionate share of the total amount of the local government fund additional revenue formula" means each county's proportionate share of the state's population as determined for and certified to the county for distributions to be made during the current calendar year under division (B)(2)(a) of section 5747.501 of the Revised Code. If prior to the first day of January of the current calendar year the federal government has issued a revision to the population figures reflected in the estimate produced pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of section 5747.501 of the Revised Code, such revised population figures shall be used for making the distributions during the current calendar year. (3) "2007 LGF and LGRAF county distribution base available in that month" means the lesser of the amounts described in division (A)(3)(a) and (b) of this section, provided that the amount shall not be less than zero: (a) The total amount available for distribution to counties from the local government fund during the current month. (b) The total amount distributed to counties from the local government fund and the local government revenue assistance fund to counties in calendar year 2007 less the total amount distributed to counties under division (B)(1) of this section during previous months of the current calendar year. (4) "Local government fund additional revenue distribution base available during that month" means the total amount available for distribution to counties during the month from the local government fund, less any amounts to be distributed in that month from the local government fund under division (B)(1) of this section, provided that the local government fund additional revenue distribution base available during that month shall not be less than zero. (5) "Total amount available for distribution to counties" means the total amount available for distribution from the local government fund during the current month less the total amount available for distribution to municipal corporations during the current month under division (C) of this section. (B) On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall provide for payment to each county an amount equal to the sum of: (1) The county's proportionate share of the calendar year 2007 LGF and LGRAF distributions multiplied by the 2007 LGF and LGRAF county distribution base available in that month, provided that if the 2007 LGF and LGRAF county distribution base available in that month is zero, no payment shall be made under division (B)(1) of this section for the month or the remainder of the calendar year; and (2) The county's proportionate share of the total amount of the local government fund additional revenue formula multiplied by the local government fund additional revenue distribution base available during that month. Money received into the treasury of a county under this division shall be credited to the undivided local government fund in the treasury of the county on or before the fifteenth day of each month. On or before the twentieth day of each month, the county auditor shall issue warrants against all of the undivided local government fund in the county treasury in the respective amounts allowed as provided in section 5747.51 of the Revised Code, and the treasurer shall distribute and pay such sums to the subdivision therein. (C)(1) As used in division (C) of this section: (a) "Total amount available for distribution to municipalities during the current month" means the difference obtained by subtracting one million dollars from the product obtained by multiplying the total amount available for distribution from the local government fund during the current month by the aggregate municipal share. (b) "Aggregate municipal share" means the quotient obtained by dividing the total amount distributed directly from the local government fund to municipal corporations during calendar year 2007 by the total distributions from the local government fund and local government revenue assistance fund during calendar year 2007. (c) A municipal corporation's "distribution share" equals one of the following: (i) For municipal corporations with a population of more than fifty thousand, fifty thousand; (ii) For municipal corporations with a population of less than one thousand, zero; (iii) For all other municipal corporations, the municipal corporation's population. (d) A municipal corporation's "distribution percentage" equals the percentage that a municipal corporation's distribution share is of the total of all municipal corporations' distribution shares. (2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall provide for payment from the local government fund to each municipal corporation an amount equal to the product derived by multiplying the municipal corporation's distribution percentage by the total amount available for distribution to municipal corporations during the current month. (3) Payments received by a municipal corporation under this division shall be paid into its general fund and may be used for any lawful purpose. (4) The amount distributed to municipal corporations under this division during any calendar year shall not exceed the amount distributed directly from the local government fund to municipal corporations during calendar year 2007. If that maximum amount is reached during any month, distributions to municipal corporations in that month shall be as provided in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, but no further distributions shall be made to municipal corporations under division (C) of this section during the remainder of the calendar year. (5) Upon being informed of a municipal corporation's dissolution, the tax commissioner shall cease providing for payments to that municipal corporation under division (C) of this section. The proportionate shares of the total amount available for distribution to each of the remaining municipal corporations under this division shall be increased on a pro rata basis. The tax commissioner shall reduce payments under division (C) of this section to municipal corporations for which reduced payments are required under section 5747.502, 5747.504, or section 5747.506 of the Revised Code. (D) Each municipal corporation which has in effect a tax imposed under Chapter 718. of the Revised Code shall, no later than the thirty-first day of August of each year, certify to the tax commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, the amount of income tax revenue collected and refunded by such municipal corporation pursuant to such chapter during the preceding calendar year, arranged, when possible, by the type of income from which the revenue was collected or the refund was issued. The municipal corporation shall also report the amount of income tax revenue collected and refunded on behalf of a joint economic development district or a joint economic development zone that levies an income tax administered by the municipal corporation and the amount of such revenue distributed to contracting parties during the preceding calendar year. The tax commissioner may withhold payment of local government fund moneys pursuant to division (C) of this section from any municipal corporation for failure to comply with this reporting requirement. (E)(1) For the purposes of division (E) of this section: (a) "Eligible taxing district" means a township, township fire district, or joint fire district for which the total taxable value of eligible power plants for tax year 2017 is at least thirty per cent less than the total taxable value of eligible power plants for tax year 2016. (b) "Eligible power plant" means a power plant that is subject to the requirements of 10 C.F.R. part 73. (c) "Total taxable value of eligible power plants" of an eligible taxing district means the total taxable value of the taxable property of eligible power plants apportioned to the district as shown in a preliminary assessment or amended preliminary assessment and listed on the tax list of real and public utility property. (d) "Taxable property" has the same meaning as in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code. (e) "Tax rate" of an eligible taxing district means one of the following: (i) For townships, the sum of the rates of levies imposed under section 505.39, 505.51, or division (I), (J), (U), or (JJ) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code and extended on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2017, excluding any levy imposed at whatever rate is required to raise a fixed sum of money; (ii) For township fire districts and joint fire districts, the sum of the rates of levies extended on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2017, excluding any levy imposed at whatever rate is required to raise a fixed sum of money. (2) Each fiscal year from fiscal year 2018 through fiscal year 2028, the tax commissioner shall compute the following amount for each eligible taxing district: (a) For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, the amount obtained by multiplying the eligible taxing district's tax rate by the difference obtained by subtracting (i) the total taxable value of eligible power plants of the district for tax year 2017 from (ii) the total taxable value of eligible power plants of the district for tax year 2016; (b) For fiscal years 2020 through 2028, ninety per cent of the amount calculated for the district under division (E)(2)(a) or (b) of this section for the preceding fiscal year. The commissioner shall certify the sum of the amounts calculated for all eligible taxing districts under this division for a fiscal year to the director of budget and management who, on or before the seventh day of each month of that fiscal year, shall transfer from the general revenue fund to the local government fund one-twelfth of the amount certified. (3) On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall provide for payment to each county treasury in which an eligible taxing district is located an amount equal to one-twelfth of the amount computed for the district for that fiscal year under division (E)(2) of this section. Money received into the treasury of a county under division (E) of this section shall be credited to the undivided local government fund in the treasury of the county on or before the fifteenth day of each month. On or before the twentieth day of each month, the county auditor shall issue warrants against the undivided local government fund for the amounts attributable to each eligible taxing district, and the treasurer shall distribute and pay such amounts to each eligible taxing district. Money received by a township fire district or joint fire district under this division shall be credited to the district's general fund and may be used for any lawful purpose of the district. Money received by a township under this division shall be credited to the township's general fund and shall be used for the purpose of funding fire, police, emergency medical, or ambulance services. Sec. 5747.502. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Traffic law photo-monitoring device" has the same meaning as in section 4511.092 of the Revised Code. (2) "School zone" has the same meaning as in section 4511.21 of the Revised Code. (3) "Transportation district" means a territorial district established by the director of transportation under section 5501.14 of the Revised Code. (4) "District deputy director" means the person appointed and assigned by the director of transportation under section 5501.14 of the Revised Code to administer the activities of a transportation district. (5) "Gross amount" means the entire amount of traffic camera fines and fees paid by a driver. (6) "Local government fund adjustment" or "LGF adjustment" means the sum of: (a) The gross amount of all traffic camera fines collected by a local authority during the preceding fiscal year, as reported under division (B)(1) of this section, if such a report is required; plus (b) The residual adjustment computed for the local authority under division (B)(4) of this section, if such an adjustment applies. (7) "Local government fund payments" or "LGF payments" means the payments a local authority would receive under sections 5747.503, 5747.51, and 5747.53, and division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, as applicable, if not for the reductions required by divisions (C) and (D) of this section or section 5747.506 of the Revised Code. (8) "Residual adjustment" means the most recent LGF adjustment computed for a local authority under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section minus the sum of the reductions applied after that computation under division (C) of this section to the local authority's LGF payments. (9) "Traffic camera fines" means civil fines for any violation of any local ordinance or resolution that are based upon evidence recorded by a traffic law photo-monitoring device. (10) "Qualifying village" has the same meaning as in section 5747.503 of the Revised Code. (11) "Local authority" means a municipal corporation, county, or township. (B)(1) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of July, any local authority that directly or indirectly collected traffic camera fines during the preceding fiscal year shall file a report with the tax commissioner that includes a detailed statement of the gross amount of all traffic camera fines the local authority collected during that period and the gross amount of such fines that the local authority collected for violations that occurred within a school zone. (2) Annually, on or before the tenth day of August, and except as otherwise provided in this division, the commissioner shall compute a local government fund adjustment for each local authority that files a report under division (B)(1) of this section or with respect to which a residual adjustment applies. Subject to division (B)(3) of this section and section 5747.505 of the Revised Code, the LGF adjustment shall be used by the commissioner to determine the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section for each of the next twelve months, starting with the month in which the LGF adjustment is computed. After those twelve months, the LGF adjustment ceases to apply and, if an LGF adjustment continues to be required, the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section shall be determined based on an updated LGF adjustment computed under this division. After the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, no LGF adjustment shall be calculated for a county or township prohibited from operating a traffic law photo-monitoring device by section 4511.093 of the Revised Code. An LGF adjustment that applies to a county or township on the effective date of this amendment September 30, 2025, ceases to apply as of that date. (3) Upon receipt of a report described by division (B)(1) of this section that is not timely filed, the commissioner shall do both of the following: (a) If one or more payments to the local authority has been withheld under division (D) of this section because of the local authority's failure to file the report, notify the county auditor and county treasurer of the appropriate county that the report has been received and that, subject to division (C) of this section, payments to the local authority from the undivided local government fund are to resume. (b) Compute the local authority's LGF adjustment using the information in the report. An LGF adjustment computed under this division shall be used by the commissioner to determine the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section starting with the next required reduction. The LGF adjustment ceases to apply on the thirty-first day of the ensuing July, following which, if an LGF adjustment continues to be required, the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section shall be determined based on an updated LGF adjustment computed under division (B)(2) of this section. (4) Annually, on or before the tenth day of August, the commissioner shall compute a residual adjustment for each local authority whose LGF adjustment for the preceding year exceeds the amount by which the local authority's LGF payments were reduced during that year under division (C) of this section. The residual adjustment shall be used to compute the LGF adjustment for the ensuing year under division (B)(2) of this section. (C) Subject to section 5747.505 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall do the following, as applicable, respecting any local authority to which an LGF adjustment computed under division (B) of this section applies: (1) If the local authority is a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, reduce payments to the municipal corporation under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment. If one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment exceeds the amount of money the municipal corporation would otherwise receive under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the excess, or (b) the amount of the payment the municipal corporation would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (2) If the local authority is a township or qualifying village, reduce the supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by the lesser of one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment, or the amount of money the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive under that section. If one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment exceeds the amount of money the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the excess, or (b) the amount of the payment the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (3) If the local authority is a county, reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment, or (b) the amount of the payment the county would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (4) For any local authority, on or before the tenth day of each month a reduction is made under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, make a payment to the local authority in an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the gross amount of traffic camera fines the local authority collected in the preceding fiscal year for violations that occurred within a school zone, as indicated on the report filed by the local authority pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, or (b) the amount by which the local authority's LGF payments were reduced that month pursuant to division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. Payments received by a local authority under this division shall be used by the local authority for school safety purposes. (D) Subject to section 5747.505 of the Revised Code, upon discovery, based on information in the commissioner's possession, that a local authority required to file a report under division (B)(1) of this section has failed to do so, the commissioner shall do the following, as applicable: (1) If the local authority is a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, cease providing for payments to the municipal corporation under section 5747.50 of the Revised Code beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (2) If the local authority is a township or qualifying village, reduce the supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the local authority would otherwise receive under that section, beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (3) For any local authority, reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the local authority would otherwise receive under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (4) For any local authority, notify the county auditor and county treasurer that such payments are to cease until the commissioner notifies the auditor and treasurer under division (E) of this section that the payments are to resume. (E) The commissioner shall notify the county auditor and county treasurer on or before the day the commissioner first reduces a county undivided local government fund payment to that county under division (C) of this section. The notice shall include the full amount of the reduction, a list of the local authorities to which the reduction applies, and the amount of reduction attributed to each such local authority. The commissioner shall send an updated notice to the county auditor and county treasurer any time the amount the reduction attributed to any local authority changes. A county treasurer that receives a notice from the commissioner under this division or division (B)(3)(a) or (D)(4) of this section shall reduce, cease, or resume payments from the undivided local government fund to the local authority that is the subject of the notice as specified by the commissioner in the notice. Unless otherwise specified in the notice, the payments shall be reduced, ceased, or resumed beginning with the next required payment. (F)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Ohio highway and transportation safety fund. On or before the tenth day of each month, the commissioner shall deposit in the fund an amount equal to the total amount by which payments to local authorities were reduced or ceased under division (C) or (D) of this section minus the total amount of payments made under division (C)(4) of this section. Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this section, the amount deposited with respect to a local authority shall be credited to an account to be created in the fund for the transportation district in which that local authority is located. If the local authority is located within more than one transportation district, the amount credited to the account of each such transportation district shall be prorated on the basis of the number of centerline miles of public roads and highways in both the local authority and the respective districts. Amounts credited to a transportation district's account shall be used by the department of transportation and the district deputy director exclusively to enhance public safety on public roads and highways within that transportation district. (2) Notwithstanding division (F)(1) of this section, in fiscal year 2026, six million dollars of the amount in the Ohio highway and transportation safety fund, including any account thereof, shall be used for rail development infrastructure projects pursuant to an appropriation made by the general assembly. The amounts credited to each account of a transportation district pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section shall be reduced in the same proportion that the amount deposited in each account is of the total fund balance. Sec. 5747.504. (A) As used in this section, "local government fund payments" means the payments a municipal corporation or county would receive under sections 5747.503, 5747.51, and 5747.53, and division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, as applicable, if not for the reductions required by this section or section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning with the month following receipt of a notice from the secretary of state pursuant to division (B) of section 3505.011 or 3513.141 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall do the following, as applicable: (1) If the notice concerns a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, cease providing for payments to the municipal corporation under section 5747.50 of the Revised Code beginning with the next required payment; (2) If the notice concerns a qualifying village, as defined in section 5747.503 of the Revised Code, reduce the supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the qualifying village would otherwise receive under that section, beginning with the next required payment; (3) For any county or municipal corporation identified in the notice, reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the county or municipal corporation would otherwise receive under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, beginning with the next required payment. (C) Subject to section 5747.505 of the Revised Code, upon receiving notice from the secretary of state, under division (C) of section 3505.11 or 3513.141 of the Revised Code, that a county or municipal corporation has, by resolution or ordinance, rescinded previous approval for the use of ranked choice voting, the commissioner shall resume all local government fund payments ceased or reduced under division (B) of this section due to that county's or municipal corporation's use of ranked choice voting. (D)(1) The commissioner shall notify the county auditor and county treasurer on or before the day the commissioner first reduces a county undivided local government fund payment to that county under division (B)(3) of this section. The notice shall include the full amount of the reduction, a list of the counties and municipal corporations to which the reduction applies, and the amount of reduction attributed to each such county or municipal corporation. (2) The commissioner shall also notify the county auditor and county treasurer on or before the day that the commissioner first resumes payments to the county undivided local government fund under division (C) of this section. The notification shall include a list of the counties or municipal corporations that are again eligible to receive local government fund payments. (3) Subject to section 5747.505 of the Revised Code, a county treasurer that receives a notice from the commissioner under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall cease or resume payments from the undivided local government fund to the county or municipal corporation that is the subject of the notice as specified by the commissioner in the notice. (E) On or before the tenth day of each month, the commissioner shall transfer from the local government fund to the general revenue fund the sum of the payments withheld that month under division (B) of this section. Sec. 5747.505. If a municipal corporation or county is subject to more than one reduction required by sections 5747.502 and , 5747.504, and 5747.506 of the Revised Code for the same month, the tax commissioner shall apply the reduction those reductions, and make the attendant deposits or payments, in the following order: (A) The reduction required by section 5747.504 of the Revised Code first and the deposit the amount of payments withheld to the general revenue fund required under division (E) of that section; (B) The reduction required by section 5747.502 of the Revised Code, the payment required by division (C)(4) of that section, and the deposit required by division (F)(1) of that section; (C) The reduction required by section 5747.506 of the Revised Code and the deposit required by division (E) of that section. Sec. 5747.506. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Gender reassignment surgery adjustment" means twenty-five per cent of a local authority's local government fund payment for a month. (2) "Local authority" has the same meaning as in section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. (3) "Local government fund payments" or "LGF payments" means the payments a local authority would receive each month under sections 5747.503, 5747.51, and 5747.53, and division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, as applicable, if not for the reductions required by this section. (4) "Qualifying village" has the same meaning as in section 5747.503 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon receiving certification from the attorney general, pursuant to division (D) of section 9.051 of the Revised Code, that a local authority is not in compliance, or has failed to certify compliance, with division (B) of that section, the commissioner shall subtract a gender reassignment surgery adjustment from the local authority's LGF payments, as described in division (C) of this section, beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the reduction has been applied to twelve required payments. (C)(1) If the local authority is a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, the commissioner shall first reduce payments to the municipal corporation under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by the lesser of the gender reassignment surgery adjustment or the amount the municipal corporation would otherwise receive under that division. If the gender reassignment surgery adjustment exceeds the amount of money the municipal corporation would otherwise receive under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by the excess gender reassignment surgery adjustment. (2) If the local authority is a qualifying village or township, the commissioner shall first reduce supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by the lesser of the gender reassignment surgery adjustment, or the amount of money the qualifying village or township would otherwise receive under that section. If the gender reassignment surgery adjustment exceeds the amount of money the qualifying village or township would otherwise receive under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by the excess gender reassignment surgery adjustment. (3) If the local authority is a county, the commissioner shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by the gender reassignment surgery adjustment. (D) The tax commissioner shall notify the county auditor and county treasurer on or before the day the commissioner first reduces a county undivided local government fund payment to that county under division (C) of this section. The notice shall include the full amount of the reduction, a list of the local authorities to which the reduction applies, the amount of reduction attributed to each such local authority, and when the reduction shall cease. A county treasurer that receives a notice from the commissioner under this division shall reduce payments from the undivided local government fund to the local authority that is the subject of the notice for each month that the reduction applies. Unless otherwise specified in the notice, the payments shall be reduced beginning with the next required payment. (E) On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall transfer from the local government fund to the general revenue fund the sum of the payments withheld that month under division (C) of this section. Sec. 5747.51. (A) On or before the twenty-fifth day of July of each year, the tax commissioner shall make and certify to the county auditor of each county an estimate of the amount of the local government fund to be allocated to the undivided local government fund of each county for the ensuing calendar year, adjusting the total as required to account for subdivisions receiving reduced local government funds under section 5747.502, 5774.504, or 5747.505 of the Revised Code. (B) At each annual regular session of the county budget commission convened pursuant to section 5705.27 of the Revised Code, each auditor shall present to the commission the certificate of the commissioner, the annual tax budget and estimates, and the records showing the action of the commission in its last preceding regular session. The commission, after extending to the representatives of each subdivision an opportunity to be heard, under oath administered by any member of the commission, and considering all the facts and information presented to it by the auditor, shall determine the amount of the undivided local government fund needed by and to be apportioned to each subdivision for current operating expenses, as shown in the tax budget of the subdivision. This determination shall be made pursuant to divisions (C) to (I) of this section, unless the commission has provided for a formula pursuant to section 5747.53 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall reduce the amount of funds from the undivided local government fund to a subdivision required to receive reduced funds under section 5747.502, 5747.504, or 5747.505 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section prevents the budget commission, for the purpose of apportioning the undivided local government fund, from inquiring into the claimed needs of any subdivision as stated in its tax budget, or from adjusting claimed needs to reflect actual needs. For the purposes of this section, "current operating expenses" means the lawful expenditures of a subdivision, except those for permanent improvements and except payments for interest, sinking fund, and retirement of bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of the subdivision. (C) The commission shall determine the combined total of the estimated expenditures, including transfers, from the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities operated by a subdivision, as shown in the subdivision's tax budget for the ensuing calendar year. (D) From the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, the commission shall deduct the following expenditures, if included in these funds in the tax budget: (1) Expenditures for permanent improvements as defined in division (E) of section 5705.01 of the Revised Code; (2) In the case of counties and townships, transfers to the road and bridge fund, and in the case of municipalities, transfers to the street construction, maintenance, and repair fund and the state highway improvement fund; (3) Expenditures for the payment of debt charges; (4) Expenditures for the payment of judgments. (E) In addition to the deductions made pursuant to division (D) of this section, revenues accruing to the general fund and any special fund considered under division (C) of this section from the following sources shall be deducted from the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section: (1) Taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation, as defined in section 5705.02 of the Revised Code; (2) The budget commission allocation of estimated county public library fund revenues to be distributed pursuant to section 5747.48 of the Revised Code; (3) Estimated unencumbered balances as shown on the tax budget as of the thirty-first day of December of the current year in the general fund, but not any estimated balance in any special fund considered in division (C) of this section; (4) Revenue, including transfers, shown in the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities, from all other sources except those that a subdivision receives from an additional tax or service charge voted by its electorate or receives from special assessment or revenue bond collection. For the purposes of this division, where the charter of a municipal corporation prohibits the levy of an income tax, an income tax levied by the legislative authority of such municipal corporation pursuant to an amendment of the charter of that municipal corporation to authorize such a levy represents an additional tax voted by the electorate of that municipal corporation. For the purposes of this division, any measure adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to section 322.02, 4504.02, or 5739.021 of the Revised Code, including those measures upheld by the electorate in a referendum conducted pursuant to section 322.021, 4504.021, or 5739.022 of the Revised Code, shall not be considered an additional tax voted by the electorate. Money in a reserve balance account established by a county, township, or municipal corporation under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Money in a reserve balance account established by a township under section 5705.132 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. If a county, township, or municipal corporation has created and maintains a nonexpendable trust fund under section 5705.131 of the Revised Code, the principal of the fund, and any additions to the principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from such a fund, shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Only investment earnings arising from investment of the principal or investment of such additions to principal may be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under those divisions. (F) The total expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, less the deductions authorized in divisions (D) and (E) of this section, shall be known as the "relative need" of the subdivision, for the purposes of this section. (G) The budget commission shall total the relative need of all participating subdivisions in the county, and shall compute a relative need factor by dividing the total estimate of the undivided local government fund by the total relative need of all participating subdivisions. (H) The relative need of each subdivision shall be multiplied by the relative need factor to determine the proportionate share of the subdivision in the undivided local government fund of the county; provided, that the maximum proportionate share of a county shall not exceed the following maximum percentages of the total estimate of the undivided local government fund governed by the relationship of the percentage of the population of the county that resides within municipal corporations within the county to the total population of the county as reported in the reports on population in Ohio by the department of development as of the twentieth day of July of the year in which the tax budget is filed with the budget commission: 1 2 A Percentage of municipal population within the county: Percentage share of the county shall not exceed: B Less than forty-one per cent Sixty per cent C Forty-one per cent or more but less than eighty-one per cent Fifty per cent D Eighty-one per cent or more Thirty per cent Where the proportionate share of the county exceeds the limitations established in this division, the budget commission shall adjust the proportionate shares determined pursuant to this division so that the proportionate share of the county does not exceed these limitations, and it shall increase the proportionate shares of all other subdivisions on a pro rata basis. In counties having a population of less than one hundred thousand, not less than ten per cent shall be distributed to the townships therein. (I) The proportionate share of each subdivision in the undivided local government fund determined pursuant to division (H) of this section for any calendar year shall not be less than the product of the average of the percentages of the undivided local government fund of the county as apportioned to that subdivision for the calendar years 1968, 1969, and 1970, multiplied by the total amount of the undivided local government fund of the county apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970. For the purposes of this division, the total apportioned amount for the calendar year 1970 shall be the amount actually allocated to the county in 1970 from the state collected intangible tax as levied by section 5707.03 of the Revised Code and distributed pursuant to section 5725.24 of the Revised Code, plus the amount received by the county in the calendar year 1970 pursuant to division (B)(1) of former section 5739.21 of the Revised Code, and distributed pursuant to former section 5739.22 of the Revised Code. If the total amount of the undivided local government fund for any calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970, the minimum amount guaranteed to each subdivision for that calendar year pursuant to this division shall be reduced on a basis proportionate to the amount by which the amount of the undivided local government fund for that calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned for the calendar year 1970. (J) On the basis of such apportionment, the county auditor shall compute the percentage share of each such subdivision in the undivided local government fund and shall at the same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share of the county as a subdivision. No payment shall be made from the undivided local government fund, except in accordance with such percentage shares. Within ten days after the budget commission has made its apportionment, whether conducted pursuant to section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, the auditor shall publish a list of the subdivisions and the amount each is to receive from the undivided local government fund and the percentage share of each subdivision, in a newspaper or newspapers of countywide circulation, and send a copy of such allocation to the tax commissioner. The county auditor shall also send a copy of such allocation by ordinary or electronic mail to the fiscal officer of each subdivision entitled to participate in the allocation of the undivided local government fund of the county. This copy shall constitute the official notice of the commission action referred to in section 5705.37 of the Revised Code. All money received into the treasury of a subdivision from the undivided local government fund in a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. If a municipal corporation maintains a municipal university, such municipal university, when the board of trustees so requests the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, shall participate in the money apportioned to such municipal corporation from the total local government fund, however created and constituted, in such amount as requested by the board of trustees, provided such sum does not exceed nine per cent of the total amount paid to the municipal corporation. If any public official fails to maintain the records required by sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised Code or by the rules issued by the tax commissioner, the auditor of state, or the treasurer of state pursuant to such sections, or fails to comply with any law relating to the enforcement of such sections, the local government fund money allocated to the county may be withheld until such time as the public official has complied with such sections or such law or the rules issued pursuant thereto. Sec. 5747.53. (A) As used in this section: (1) "City, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population" means the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population residing in the county; however, if the county budget commission on or before January 1, 1998, adopted an alternative method of apportionment that was approved by the legislative authority of the city, located partially in the county, with the greatest population but not the greatest population residing in the county, "city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population" means the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population whether residing in the county or not, if this alternative meaning is adopted by action of the board of county commissioners and a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations located wholly or partially in the county. (2) "Participating political subdivision" means a municipal corporation or township that satisfies all of the following: (a) It is located wholly or partially in the county. (b) It is not the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. (c) Undivided local government fund moneys are apportioned to it under the county's alternative method or formula of apportionment in the current calendar year. (B) In lieu of the method of apportionment of the undivided local government fund of the county provided by section 5747.51 of the Revised Code, the county budget commission may provide for the apportionment of the fund under an alternative method or on a formula basis as authorized by this section. The commissioner shall reduce the amount of funds from the undivided local government fund to a subdivision required to receive reduced funds under section 5747.502, 5747.504, or 5747.505 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, the alternative method of apportionment shall have first been approved by all of the following governmental units: the board of county commissioners; the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population; and a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations, located wholly or partially in the county, excluding the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. In granting or denying approval for an alternative method of apportionment, the board of county commissioners, boards of township trustees, and legislative authorities of municipal corporations shall act by motion. A motion to approve shall be passed upon a majority vote of the members of a board of county commissioners, board of township trustees, or legislative authority of a municipal corporation, shall take effect immediately, and need not be published. Any alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved under this division shall be reviewed by the county budget commission at a public hearing held at least once in the year following the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, and in every fifth year thereafter. The county budget commission shall provide reasonable advance notice of the hearing to all political subdivisions eligible to participate in the fund and shall take public testimony from any such political subdivision that wishes to testify. Any alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved under this division may be revised, amended, or repealed in the same manner as it may be adopted and approved. If an alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved under this division is repealed, the undivided local government fund of the county shall be apportioned among the subdivisions eligible to participate in the fund, commencing in the ensuing calendar year, under the apportionment provided in section 5747.52 of the Revised Code, unless the repeal occurs by operation of division (C) of this section or a new method for apportionment of the fund is provided in the action of repeal. (C) This division applies only in counties in which the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population has a population of twenty thousand or less and a population that is less than fifteen per cent of the total population of the county. In such a county, the legislative authorities or boards of township trustees of two or more participating political subdivisions, which together have a population residing in the county that is a majority of the total population of the county, each may adopt a resolution to exclude the approval otherwise required of the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. All of the resolutions to exclude that approval shall be adopted not later than the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under an alternative method of apportionment. A motion granting or denying approval of an alternative method of apportionment under this division shall be adopted by a majority vote of the members of the board of county commissioners and by a majority vote of a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of the municipal corporations located wholly or partially in the county, other than the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population, shall take effect immediately, and need not be published. The alternative method of apportionment under this division shall be adopted and approved annually, not later than the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under it. A motion granting approval of an alternative method of apportionment under this division repeals any existing alternative method of apportionment, effective with distributions to be made from the fund in the ensuing calendar year. An alternative method of apportionment under this division shall not be revised or amended after the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under it. (D) In determining an alternative method of apportionment authorized by this section, the county budget commission may include in the method any factor considered to be appropriate and reliable, in the sole discretion of the county budget commission. (E) The limitations set forth in section 5747.51 of the Revised Code, stating the maximum amount that the county may receive from the undivided local government fund and the minimum amount the townships in counties having a population of less than one hundred thousand may receive from the fund, are applicable to any alternative method of apportionment authorized under this section. (F) On the basis of any alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved as authorized by this section, as certified by the auditor to the county treasurer, the county treasurer shall make distribution of the money in the undivided local government fund to each subdivision eligible to participate in the fund, and the auditor, when the amount of those shares is in the custody of the treasurer in the amounts so computed to be due the respective subdivisions, shall at the same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share of the county as a subdivision. All money received into the treasury of a subdivision from the undivided local government fund in a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. If a municipal corporation maintains a municipal university, the university, when the board of trustees so requests the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, shall participate in the money apportioned to the municipal corporation from the total local government fund, however created and constituted, in the amount requested by the board of trustees, provided that amount does not exceed nine per cent of the total amount paid to the municipal corporation. (G) The actions of the county budget commission taken pursuant to this section are final and may not be appealed to the board of tax appeals, except on the issues of abuse of discretion and failure to comply with the formula. Section 2. That existing sections 4117.10, 5747.50, 5747.502, 5747.504, 5747.505, 5747.51, and 5747.53 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. (A) As used in this section, "policy, contract, or plan" has the same meaning as in section 9.051 of the Revised Code as enacted by this act. (B) Section 9.051 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, applies to any policy, contract, or plan entered into on or after the effective date of this section. Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 5747.502 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 54, H.B. 96, and S.B. 63 all of the 136th General Assembly. Section 5747.53 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly and H.B. 62 of the 133rd General Assembly.